Louisiana, session 2026, HB760.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:440.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§440.3. Unauthorized fees or co-payments
A healthcare provider who is enrolled in the medical assistance programs and
who has accepted a recipient as a patient shall accept the medical assistance program
payment as payment in full for any covered service where a prescription is issued for
medication-assisted treatment. A healthcare provider shall not charge a fee or
co-payment to a recipient for a covered service unless expressly authorized by the
medical assistance programs. A violation of this Section shall result in the
healthcare provider being terminated or excluded from participation in the medical
assistance programs for a period not to exceed one year as determined by the
Louisiana Department of Health.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1249 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 760